Utah statutes.
53B-25-203.   Duties not created.

(1)  This chapter does not create a duty for a postsecondary institution to search or monitor the activity of a personal Internet account.

(2)  A postsecondary institution is not liable under this chapter for failure to request or require that a student or prospective student grant access to, allow observation of, or disclose information that allows access to or observation of the student's or prospective student's personal Internet account.



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

